Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-420
Supplementary seminars; purpose.

In cooperation with the county assessors association, the Property Tax Administrator may arrange and conduct seminars in assessment methods, which seminars shall be supplementary to any educational course required under section 77-414.

Laws 1963, c. 439, § 6, p. 1458;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 51;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 443, § 4.